Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-420
Deed, mortgage, trust deed, other instrument in writing; online notarial act; validity.

No deed, mortgage, trust deed, or other instrument in writing for the conveyance or encumbrance of real estate, or any interest therein, shall be invalidated because it involved the performance of an online notarial act on or after April 2, 2020, and before July 1, 2020, pursuant to the Governor's Executive Order No. 20-13, dated April 1, 2020. Such deed, mortgage, trust deed, or other instrument in writing is declared to be legal and valid in all courts of law and equity in this state and elsewhere.

Laws 2021, LB94, § 3.